Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-316
Insurer; policy and endorsement; mailing, delivery, or posting on website; conditions for posting on insurer's website.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 44-315, life insurance policies, annuity contracts, and property and casualty insurance policies and endorsements that do not contain personally identifiable financial information as defined in section 44-903 may be mailed, delivered, or posted on the insurer's website. If the insurer elects to post insurance policies and endorsements on its website in lieu of mailing or delivering them to the insured, the insurer must comply with all of the following conditions:

(1) The policy and endorsements must be accessible to the insured and producer of record and remain that way for as long as the policy is in force;

(2) After the expiration of the policy, the insurer must archive its expired policies and endorsements for a period of five years and make them available upon request;

(3) The policies and endorsements must be posted in a manner that enables the insured and producer of record to print and save the policy and endorsements using programs or applications that are widely available on the Internet and free to use;

(4) The insurer must provide the following information in, or simultaneously with, each declarations page provided at the time of issuance of the initial policy and any renewals of such policy:

(a) A description of the exact policy and endorsement forms purchased by the insured;

(b) A description of the insured's right to receive, upon request and without charge, a paper copy of the policy and endorsements by mail; and

(c) The Internet address where the policy and endorsements are posted;

(5) The insurer, upon request and without charge, must mail a paper copy of the policy and endorsements to the insured; and

(6) The insurer must provide notice, in the manner in which the insurer customarily communicates with the insured, of any changes to the forms or endorsements, the insured's right to obtain, upon request and without charge, a paper copy of such forms or endorsements, and the Internet address where such forms or endorsements are posted.

Laws 2019, LB116, § 2.